California statutes. Public Resources Code
(9) Any other information the department reasonably requires.

(c) An annual program budget submitted pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall include, at a minimum, both
 of the following for the upcoming calendar year:

(1) An independent financial audit of the stewardship program, as required by subdivision (b) of Section 42033.4, funded by the stewardship organization from the charge paid from its member covered entities pursuant to Section 42034 or by a covered entity if it operates its own stewardship program.

(2) Anticipated costs and the recommended funding level necessary to implement the stewardship program, including, but not limited to, costs to cover the stewardship plan’s budgeted costs and to operate the stewardship program over a multiyear period in a prudent and responsible manner.

(d) (1) The department shall determine if a submitted annual report and program budget are complete and notify the submitting stewardship organization or covered entity
 within 30 days.

(2) If the department finds that an annual report and program budget are complete, the department’s 90-day review period for consideration of approval of the annual report and program budget, set forth in subdivision (e), shall commence upon the original date of receipt.

(3) If the department determines either an annual report or a program budget is incomplete, the department shall identify for the program operator within 30 days the required additional information, and the program operator shall submit a revised annual report or program budget, as applicable, within 30 days.

(4) If the department determines upon resubmission that the annual report or program budget is complete, the department’s 90-day review period for consideration of approval of the annual report or program budget shall commence
 upon the date of receipt of the resubmitted report or program budget.

(e) (1) The department shall review the annual report and program budget required pursuant to this section and within 90 days of receipt shall approve, disapprove, or conditionally approve the annual report and program budget.

(2) (A) If the department conditionally approves an annual report or program budget, the department shall identify the deficiencies in the annual report or program budget and the program operator shall comply with the conditions of the conditional approval within 60 days of the notice date, unless the Director of Resources Recycling and Recovery determines that additional time is needed.

(B) If the department conditionally approves an annual report or program budget and the
 conditions are not met within 60 days of the notice date, unless additional time is granted pursuant to subparagraph (A), the department shall disapprove the annual report or program budget.

(3) If the department disapproves an annual report or program budget, the department shall identify the deficiencies in the annual report or program budget and the program operator shall submit a revised annual report or program budget and provide any supplemental information requested within 60 days of the notice date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1004, Sec. 1.   (SB 212)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42033.4.

(a) A program operator shall keep minutes, books, and records that clearly reflect the activities and transactions of the program operator’s stewardship program.

(b) (1) The minutes, books, and records of a program operator shall be audited at the program operator’s expense by an independent certified public accountant retained by the program operator at least once each calendar year.

(2) A program operator shall arrange for the independent certified public accountant audit to be delivered to the department, along with the annual report and program budget submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42033.2.

(3) The department may conduct its own audit of a program operator. The department shall review the independent certified public accountant audit for compliance with this chapter and consistency with the program operator’s stewardship plan, annual report, and program budget submitted pursuant to this chapter. The department shall notify the program operator of any conduct or practice that does not comply with this chapter or of any inconsistencies identified in the department’s audit. The program operator may obtain copies of the department’s audit, including proprietary information contained in the department’s audit, upon request. The department shall not disclose any confidential proprietary information protected pursuant to Section 42036.4 that is included in the department’s audit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1004, Sec. 1.   (SB 212)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42033.5.

For a local jurisdiction that requests removal of home-generated sharps waste or cost recovery or reimbursement for removal pursuant to Section 42032.2, the local jurisdiction shall provide information on home-generated sharps waste to the covered entity or program operator, within a reasonable time upon request by the covered entity or program operator.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1004, Sec. 1.   (SB 212)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42033.6.

As part of the administration of this chapter, within 12 months of a program operator’s submission of three consecutive complete annual reports submitted pursuant to Section 42033.2, the department shall develop, and post on its Internet Web site, a report analyzing whether the program operator’s stewardship program provides adequate access to safe disposal of home-generated sharps waste or covered drugs, as applicable, to the ultimate user.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1004, Sec. 1.   (SB 212)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Financial Provisions [42034. - 42034.4.]

42034.

In order to further the objective that covered entities establish and implement stewardship programs that comply with the requirements of this chapter, each covered entity, either individually or through a stewardship organization, shall pay all administrative and operational costs associated with establishing and implementing the stewardship program in which it participates, including the cost of collecting, transporting, and disposing of covered products.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1004, Sec. 1.   (SB 212)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42034.2.

(a) (1) On or before the end of the 2022–23 fiscal year, and on March 1 and September 1 of each year thereafter, a program operator shall pay to the department an administrative fee. The department shall set the fee at an amount that, when paid by every covered entity, is adequate to cover the department’s and any other state agency’s projected full costs of administering and enforcing this chapter, including any incurred costs that have not been reimbursed. Before March 1 and September 1 of each year, the department shall compare the total amount of fees collected for the operative billing cycle to the total actual and reasonable costs of administering and enforcing this chapter over the same period so that the total amount of fees collected is adequate and does not exceed the state’s full actual and
 reasonable regulatory costs to implement and enforce this chapter. These costs may include the actual and reasonable costs associated with regulatory activities pursuant to this chapter before submission of stewardship plans pursuant to Section 42032.

(2) For a stewardship organization, the administrative fee paid pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be funded by the covered entities that make up the stewardship organization. This administrative fee shall be in addition to the charge paid pursuant to Section 42034. A stewardship organization may require its participating covered entities to pay the administrative fee and the charge paid pursuant to Section 42034 at the same time.

(b) The department shall deposit administrative fees paid by a program operator pursuant to subdivision (a) into the Pharmaceutical and Sharps Stewardship Fund, which is hereby established. Upon appropriation
 by the Legislature, moneys in the fund may be expended by the department, the state board, and any other agency that assists in the regulatory activities of administering and enforcing this chapter. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, moneys in the fund may be used for those regulatory activities and to reimburse any outstanding loans made from other funds used to finance the startup costs of the department’s activities pursuant to this chapter. Moneys in the fund shall not be expended for any purpose not enumerated in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 22.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42034.4.

(a) (1) A stewardship organization may conduct an audit of covered entities that are required to remit a charge or administrative fee to the stewardship organization pursuant to Sections 42034 and 42034.2 to verify that the administrative fees and charges paid are proper and accurate. In addition, a stewardship organization may conduct an audit of authorized collectors to verify the charges submitted are proper and accurate. 

(2) The purpose of the audits described in paragraph (1) is to ensure parties required by this chapter to pay or collect an administrative fee or charge are paying or collecting the proper amount to implement the program.

(b) If a
 stewardship organization conducts an audit pursuant to subdivision (a), it shall do all of the following:

(1) Conduct the audit in accordance with generally accepted auditing practices.

(2) Limit the scope of the audit of covered entities to confirming whether a charge or administrative fee has been properly paid by the covered entities.

(3) Hire an independent third-party auditor to conduct the audit.

(4) Provide a copy of the audit to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1004, Sec. 1.   (SB 212)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Enforcement [42035. - 42035.8.]

42035.

(a) (1) On or before June 30, 2022, and at least annually thereafter, the department shall post on its Internet Web site a list of stewardship organizations, including entities with an approved stewardship plan, and covered entities, authorized collection sites, retail pharmacies, and retail pharmacy chains provided in the stewardship plans that are in compliance with this chapter.

(2) The state board shall coordinate with the department to verify that the list posted pursuant to paragraph (1) is consistent with the information submitted to each agency pursuant to Section 42031.

(b) A covered entity or stewardship organization that is not listed on the
 department’s Internet Web site pursuant to subdivision (a), but demonstrates compliance with this chapter before the department is required to post the following year’s list pursuant to subdivision (a), may request a certification letter from the department stating that the covered entity or stewardship organization is in compliance with this chapter. A covered entity or stewardship organization that receives a certification letter shall be deemed to be in compliance with this chapter.

(c) A distributor or wholesaler of covered products, and a pharmacy or other retailer that sells or offers for sale a covered product, shall monitor the department’s Internet Web site to determine which covered entities and stewardship organizations are in compliance with this chapter. The distributor or wholesaler and the pharmacy or other retailer shall notify the department if it determines that a covered product that it sells or offers for sale is from a
 covered entity that is not listed on the department’s Internet Web site.

(d) The sale, distribution, or offering for sale of any inventory that was in stock before the commencement of a stewardship program is exempt from this chapter and not required to be subject to a stewardship plan.

(e) If the department determines a covered entity or stewardship organization is not in compliance with this chapter, the department shall remove the entity from the list maintained on the department’s Internet Web site pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1004, Sec. 1.   (SB 212)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42035.2.

(a) (1) The department may impose an administrative penalty on any covered entity, program operator, stewardship organization, or authorized collector that sells, offers for sale, or provides a covered product in violation of this chapter.

(2) The amount of the administrative penalty imposed pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day unless the violation is intentional, knowing, or reckless, in which case the administrative penalty shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per day.

(b) The department shall not impose a penalty on a program operator pursuant to this section for failure to comply with this chapter if the program
 operator demonstrates it received false or misleading information that contributed to its failure to comply, including, for a stewardship organization, from a participating covered entity.

(c) The department shall deposit all penalties collected pursuant to this section in the Pharmaceutical and Sharps Stewardship Penalty Account, which is hereby created in the Pharmaceutical and Sharps Stewardship Fund established in Section 42034.2. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, moneys in the Pharmaceutical and Sharps Stewardship Penalty Account may be expended by the department on activities including, but not limited to, the promotion of safe handling and disposal of covered products, grants for related purposes, and the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 232.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

42035.4.

Upon a written finding that a covered entity, program operator, stewardship organization, or authorized collector has not met a material requirement of this chapter, in addition to any other penalties authorized under this chapter, the department may take one or both of the following actions to ensure compliance with the requirements of this chapter, after affording the covered entity, stewardship organization, or authorized collector a reasonable opportunity to respond to, or rebut, the finding:

(a) Revoke the program operator’s stewardship plan approval or require the program operator to resubmit the plan.

(b) Require additional reporting relating to compliance with the material requirement of
 this chapter that was not met.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1004, Sec. 1.   (SB 212)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42035.6.

(a) A covered entity, stewardship organization, program operator, retail pharmacy, or retail pharmacy chain shall do both of the following:

(1) Upon request, provide the department with reasonable and timely access, as determined by the department, to its facilities and operations, as necessary to determine compliance with this chapter.

(2) Upon request, provide the department with relevant records necessary to determine compliance with this chapter.

(b) A covered entity, stewardship organization, program operator, retail pharmacy, or retail pharmacy chain shall maintain and keep accessible all records required
 to be kept or submitted pursuant to this chapter for a minimum of three years.

(c) All reports and records provided to the department pursuant to this chapter shall be provided under penalty of perjury.

(d) The department may take disciplinary action against a covered entity, stewardship organization, program operator, pharmacy, retail pharmacy, or retail pharmacy chain that fails to provide the department with the access to information required pursuant to this section, including one or both of the following:

(1) Imposing an administrative penalty pursuant to Section 42035.2. 

(2) Posting a notice on the department’s Internet Web site, in association with the list that the department maintains pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section
 42035, that the covered entity, stewardship organization, program operator, pharmacy, retail pharmacy, or retail pharmacy chain is no longer in compliance with this chapter.

(e) The department shall not prohibit as a disciplinary action a covered entity, stewardship organization, program operator, pharmacy, retail pharmacy, or retail pharmacy chain from selling a covered product.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1004, Sec. 1.   (SB 212)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42035.8.

All handling, transport, and disposal undertaken as part of a stewardship program under this chapter shall comply with applicable state and federal laws, including, but not limited to, regulations adopted by the United States Drug Enforcement Administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1004, Sec. 1.   (SB 212)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Miscellaneous Provisions [42036. - 42036.4.]

42036.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), an action specified in subdivision (b) that is taken by a stewardship organization or a covered entity pursuant to this chapter is not a violation of the Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), or the Unfair Competition Law (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code).

(b) Subdivision (a) shall apply to all of the following actions taken by a stewardship organization or covered entity:

(1) The creation, implementation, or management of a stewardship plan approved by the department pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 42032) and the determination of the types or quantities of covered products collected or otherwise managed pursuant to a stewardship plan.

(2) The determination of the cost and structure of an approved stewardship plan.

(3) The establishment, administration, collection, or disbursement of the charge or administrative fee imposed pursuant to Section 42034 or 42034.2, respectively.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to an agreement that does any of the following:

(1) Fixes a price of or for covered products, except for an agreement related to costs,
 charges, or administrative fees associated with participation in a stewardship plan approved by the department and otherwise in accordance with this chapter.

(2) Fixes the output of production of covered products.

(3) Restricts the geographic area in which, or customers to whom, covered products are sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1004, Sec. 1.   (SB 212)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42036.2.

(a) This chapter does not apply to a drug or sharp within a jurisdiction that is subject to a local stewardship program pursuant to an ordinance that took effect before April 18, 2018. If that ordinance is repealed in the jurisdiction or, if more than one ordinance is applicable, those ordinances are repealed in the jurisdiction, the drug or sharp shall be subject to this chapter in that jurisdiction within 270 days after the date on which the ordinance is, or ordinances are, repealed.

(b) This chapter shall preempt a local stewardship program for drugs or sharps enacted by an ordinance or ordinances with an effective date on or after April 18, 2018.

(c) A local stewardship
 program for covered products enacted by an ordinance that has an effective date before April 18, 2018, may continue in operation, but the program and its participants shall not receive or benefit from moneys from the Pharmaceutical and Sharps Stewardship Fund or the Pharmaceutical and Sharps Stewardship Penalty Account, including, but not limited to, for administrative or enforcement costs. Participants of a local stewardship program for covered products enacted by an ordinance that has an effective date before April 18, 2018, shall be eligible to participate in a stewardship program under this chapter and thereby become eligible to receive funds from the Pharmaceutical and Sharps Stewardship Fund or the Pharmaceutical and Sharps Stewardship Penalty Account only if the local stewardship program is dissolved.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1004, Sec. 1.   (SB 212)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42036.4.

Proprietary information submitted to the department under this chapter shall be protected by all parties as confidential and shall be exempt from public disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code). The department and other parties may only disclose proprietary information in an aggregated form that does not directly or indirectly identify financial, production, or sales data of an individual covered entity or stewardship organization. Proprietary information may be disclosed to the party that submitted the proprietary information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 392.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Plastic Pollution Prevention and Packaging Producer Responsibility Act [42040. - 42084.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [42040. - 42041.]

42040.

(a) This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Plastic Pollution Prevention and Packaging Producer Responsibility Act.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Disadvantaged and low-income communities are disproportionately impacted by the human health and environmental impacts of plastic pollution and fossil fuel extraction.

(2) (A) Local jurisdictions are the backbone of the solid waste management and recycling efforts in California. The new statewide comprehensive circular economy framework established by this chapter is intended to shift the burden of costs to collect, process,
 and recycle materials from the local jurisdictions to the producers of covered material.

(B) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to ensure that local jurisdictions will be made financially whole for any new costs incurred associated with the implementation of this chapter and its implementing regulations.

(3) (A) In 2021, only 5 percent of postconsumer plastic waste in the United States was recycled, down from a high of 9.5 percent in 2014, when the United States exported millions of tons of plastic waste to China. Even then, much of this material was incinerated or dumped into the environment and not recycled.

(B) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish a producer responsibility program designed to ensure that producers of single-use packaging and food service
 ware covered by this program take responsibility for the costs associated with the end-of-life management of that material and ensure that the material is recyclable or compostable. This standardization will reduce consumer confusion regarding recycling and composting, reduce costs to ratepayers, and increase system efficiency.

(C) It is also the intent of the Legislature that these improvements will allow California, going forward, to better harmonize curbside collection programs as local jurisdictions will collect material identified as either recyclable or compostable if that material is found to be suitable for curbside collection.

(4) Recycling can be an effective way to reclaim some natural resources, such as metals, glass, paper, and some plastic resins. However, in some circumstances, recycling is cost-prohibitive and an ineffective means to handle the end-of-life
 management of a covered material. In these circumstances, the Legislature acknowledges that some material types cannot effectively meet the requirements of this chapter and producers will be required to eliminate, redesign, or shift packaging or food service ware to a covered material category that can more efficiently meet the requirements of this chapter.

(5) This chapter does not modify, limit, or abrogate in any manner the existing rights of an owner of recyclable materials to sell or donate those materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 848, Sec. 4.   (AB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

42041.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Advisory board” means the producer responsibility advisory board established pursuant to Section 42070.

(b) “Bulk or large format packaging” means packaging for a large amount of a product in a large packaging, thereby offsetting the need for multiple smaller packaging units for the same amount of product.

(c) “California circular economy administrative fee” means the fee imposed by the department pursuant to Section 42053.5.

(d) “Concentrate” or “concentration” means reducing the amount of packaging needed for a product by
 reformulating the product to allow for smaller quantities of the product to be used for the same purpose as the previous, larger quantity.

(e) (1) “Covered material” means both of the following:

(A) Single-use packaging that is routinely recycled, disposed of, or discarded after its contents have been used or unpackaged, and typically not refilled or otherwise reused by the producer.

(B) Plastic single-use food service ware, including, but not limited to, plastic-coated paper or plastic-coated paperboard, paper or paperboard with plastic intentionally added during the manufacturing process, and multilayer flexible material. For purposes of this subparagraph, “single-use food service ware” includes both of the following:

(i) Trays,
 plates, bowls, clamshells, lids, cups, utensils, stirrers, hinged or lidded containers, and straws.

(ii) Wraps or wrappers and bags used in the packaging of food offered for sale or provided to customers by food service establishments.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), “covered material” does not include any of the following:

(A) Packaging used for any of the following products:

(i) Medical products and products defined as devices or prescription drugs, as specified in the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. Secs. 321(g), 321(h), and 353(b)(1)).

(ii) Drugs that are used for animal medicines, including, but not limited to, parasiticide products for animals.

(iii) Products intended for animals that are regulated as animal drugs, biologics, parasiticides, medical devices, or diagnostics used to treat, or administered to, animals under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.), the federal Virus-Serum-Toxin Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq.), or the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 136 et seq.).

(iv) Infant formula, as defined in Section 321(z) of Title 21 of the United States Code.

(v) Medical food, as defined in Section 360ee(b)(3) of Title 21 of the United States Code.

(vi) Fortified oral nutritional supplements used for persons who require supplemental or sole source nutrition to meet nutritional needs due to special dietary needs directly related
 to cancer, chronic kidney disease, diabetes, malnutrition, or failure to thrive, as those terms are defined as by the International Classification of Diseases, Tenth Revision, or other medical conditions as determined by the department.

(B) Packaging used to contain products regulated by the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 136 et seq.).

(C) Plastic packaging containers that are used to contain and ship products that are classified for transportation as dangerous goods or hazardous materials under Part 178 (commencing with Section 178.0) of Subchapter C of Chapter I of Subtitle B of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(D) Packaging used to contain hazardous or flammable products classified by the 2012 federal Occupational Safety and Health Administration Hazard Communication
 Standard (29 C.F.R. 1910.1200).

(E) Beverage containers subject to the California Beverage Container Recycling and Litter Reduction Act (Division 12.1 (commencing with Section 14500)).

(F) Packaging used for the long-term protection or storage of a product that has a lifespan of not less than five years, as determined by the department.

(G) Packaging associated with paint products, as defined in Section 48701.

(H) (i) Covered material for which the producer demonstrates to the department that the covered material meets all of the following criteria:

(I) The covered material is not collected through a residential recycling collection service.

(II) The covered material does not undergo separation from other materials at a commingled recycling processing facility.

(III) The covered material is recycled at a responsible end market.

(IV) Until January 1, 2027, the producer annually demonstrates to the department that the material has had a recycling rate of 65 percent for three consecutive years. On and after January 1, 2027, the producer demonstrates to the department that the material has had a recycling rate at or over 70 percent annually, as demonstrated to the department every two years.

(ii) If only a portion of the covered material sold in or into the state by a producer meets the criteria of clause (i), only the portion of the covered material that meets the criteria of clause (i) is exempt
 from this chapter and any portion that does not meet the criteria is a covered material for purposes of this chapter.

(f) “Covered material category” means a category that includes covered material of a similar type and form, as determined by the department.

(g) “Curbside collection” means a program that includes the collection of material, including, but not limited to, covered materials, by a local jurisdiction or recycling or composting service provider under contract with a local jurisdiction.

(h) “Department” means the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery.

(i) “Disadvantaged community” means an area identified by the California Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code or an area identified as
 a disadvantaged unincorporated community pursuant to Section 65302.10 of the Government Code.

(j) “Eliminate” or “elimination,” with respect to source reduction, means the removal of a plastic component from a covered material without replacing that component with a nonplastic component.

(k) “Expanded polystyrene” means blown polystyrene and expanded or extruded foams that are thermoplastic petrochemical materials utilizing a styrene monomer and processed by any technique or techniques, including, but not limited to, fusion of polymer spheres (expandable bead polystyrene), injection molding, foam molding, and extrusion-blow molding (extruded foam polystyrene).

(l) “Lightweighting” means reducing the weight or amount of material used in a specific packaging or food service ware without functionally changing the
 packaging or food service ware. “Lightweighting” does not include changes that result in a recyclable or compostable covered material becoming nonrecyclable or noncompostable or less likely to be recycled or composted.

(m) “Local jurisdiction” means a city, county, city and county, regional agency formed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code or Article 3 (commencing with Section 40970) of Chapter 1 of Part 2, or special district that provides solid waste collection services.

(n) “Low-income community” means an area with household incomes at or below 80 percent of the statewide median income or with household incomes at or below the threshold designated as low income by the Department of Housing and Community Development’s list of state income limits adopted pursuant to Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code.

(o) “Malus fee” means a charge imposed by a PRO on a participant producer for a covered material due to the adverse environmental or public health impacts of the covered material.

(p) “Materials recovery facility” or “MRF” means a recycling facility that receives recyclable material, including, but not limited to, any covered material, for mechanical or manual sorting into specification-grade commodities for sale to a broker or end market.

(q) “Needs assessment” means a needs assessment prepared pursuant to Section 42067.

(r) “Optimize” or “optimization” means limiting the amount of covered material used in packaging by meeting product or packaging needs with minimal material. This includes, but is not limited to, eliminating unnecessary components,
 right-sizing, concentrating, and using bulk or large format packaging.

(s) “Packaging” means any separable and distinct material component used for the containment, protection, handling, delivery, or presentation of goods by the producer for the user or consumer, ranging from raw materials to processed goods. “Packaging” includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Sales packaging or primary packaging intended to provide the user or consumer the individual serving or unit of the product and most closely containing the product, food, or beverage.

(2) Grouped packaging or secondary packaging intended to bundle, sell in bulk, brand, or display the product.

(3) Transport packaging or tertiary packaging intended to protect the product during
 transport.

(4) Packaging components and ancillary elements integrated into packaging, including ancillary elements directly hung onto or attached to a product and that perform a packaging function, except both of the following:

(A) An element of the packaging or food service ware with a de minimis weight or volume, which is not an independent plastic component, as determined by the department.

(B) A component or element that is an integral part of the product, if all components or elements of the product are intended to be consumed or disposed of together.

(t) “Plastic” means a synthetic or semisynthetic material chemically synthesized by the polymerization of organic substances that can be shaped into various rigid and flexible forms, and includes
 coatings and adhesives. “Plastic” includes, without limitation, polyethylene terephthalate (PET), high density polyethylene (HDPE), polyvinyl chloride (PVC), low density polyethylene (LDPE), polypropylene (PP), polystyrene (PS), polylactic acid (PLA), and aliphatic biopolyesters, such as polyhydroxyalkanoate (PHA) and polyhydroxybutyrate (PHB). “Plastic” does not include natural rubber or naturally occurring polymers such as proteins or starches.

(u) “Plastic component” means any single piece of covered material made partially or entirely of plastic. A plastic component may constitute the entirety of the covered material or a separate or separable piece of the covered material.

(v) “Processing” means to sort, segregate, break or flake, and clean material to prepare it to meet the specification for sale to a responsible end market.

(w) (1) “Producer” means a person who manufactures a product that uses covered material and who owns or is the licensee of the brand or trademark under which the product is used in a commercial enterprise, sold, offered for sale, or distributed in the state.

(2) If there is no person in the state who is the producer for purposes of paragraph (1), the producer of the covered material is the owner or, if the owner is not in the state, the exclusive licensee of a brand or trademark under which the product using the covered material is used in a commercial enterprise, sold, offered for sale, or distributed in the state. For purposes of this subdivision, a licensee is a person holding the exclusive right to use a trademark or brand in the state in connection with the manufacture, sale, or distribution of the product packaged in or made from the covered material.

(3) If there is no person in the state who is the producer for purposes of paragraph (1) or (2), the producer of the covered material is the person who sells, offers for sale, or distributes the product that uses the covered material in or into the state.

(4) “Producer” does not include a person who produces, harvests, and packages an agricultural commodity on the site where the agricultural commodity was grown or raised.

(5) For purposes of this chapter, the sale of covered materials shall be deemed to occur in the state if the covered materials are delivered to the purchaser in the state.

(x) “Producer responsibility organization” or “PRO” means an organization that is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code of
 1986 and is formed for the purpose of implementing a plan to meet the requirements of this chapter.

(y) “Producer responsibility plan” or “plan,” unless context requires otherwise, means the plan produced by a PRO, or by a producer that chooses to assume responsibility to comply with this chapter individually, and submitted to the advisory board and department pursuant to Section 42051.1.

(z) “Rate of inbound contamination” means the amount of nonrecyclable or noncompostable materials arriving at a materials recovery facility or other recycling or composting facility.

(aa) (1) “Recycle” or “recycling” means the process of collecting, sorting, cleansing, treating, and reconstituting materials that would otherwise ultimately be disposed of onto land or into water or the atmosphere, and returning
 them to, or maintaining them within, the economic mainstream in the form of recovered material for new, reused, or reconstituted products, including compost, that meet the quality standards necessary to be used in the marketplace.

(2) “Recycle” or “recycling” does not include any of the following:

(A) Combustion.

(B) Incineration.

(C) Energy generation.

(D) Fuel production, except for anaerobic digestion of source separated organic materials.

(E) Other forms of disposal.

(3) To be considered recycled, covered material shall be sent to a responsible end
 market.

(4) (A) The department may adopt regulations to define guidelines and verification requirements for covered material shipped out of state and exported to other countries for recycling, including processing requirements, and contamination standards, or to otherwise implement this paragraph.

(B) For any mixture of plastic waste exported to another country, the PRO or producer shall certify to the department that the processes and recycling technologies used meet both of the following requirements, as determined by the department:

(i) The plastic waste is a mixture of plastic types consisting only of one or more of polyethylene, polypropylene, or polyethylene terephthalate, and the export is destined for separate recycling of each material.

(ii) The plastic waste export is not prohibited by an applicable law or treaty of the destination jurisdiction, and the import of the plastic waste into the destination jurisdiction will be conducted in accordance with all applicable laws and treaties of that destination jurisdiction.

(C) For any mixture of plastic waste exported to other states or countries, the PRO or producer shall certify to the department that the recycling technology used meets the requirements of this subdivision.
